Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 2 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE LAW
§ 56-218A. Medical assistance liens during life of recipient.

The department may recover and may impose a lien against the real property of any individual prior to his death for medical assistance paid or about to be paid under this chapter on behalf of an individual:

Who is an inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disabilities, or other medical institution, if such individual is required, as a condition of receiving services in such institution under the state plan, to spend for costs of medical care all but a minimal amount of his income required for personal needs; and

With respect to whom the department has determined, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that he cannot reasonably be expected to be discharged from the medical institution and to return home.

No lien may be imposed on the home of an individual under subsection (1) of this section if any of the following is lawfully residing in such home:

The spouse of such individual;

Such individual’s child under age twenty-one (21) years;

Such individual’s child who is blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c; or

A sibling of such individual who holds an equity interest in such home and who was residing in such home for a period of at least one (1) year prior to the individual’s admission to the medical institution.

The lien shall be perfected by filing in the office of the secretary of state a notice of lien pursuant to section 45-1904, Idaho Code. The notice of lien shall include, in addition to the information required by section 45-1904, Idaho Code, the amount paid or about to be paid by the department on behalf of the individual, and, if applicable, the fact that the amount of the lien may increase over time.
(3)(a) The lien shall be perfected by filing in the office of the secretary of state a notice of lien pursuant to section 45-1904, Idaho Code. The notice of lien shall include, in addition to the information required by section 45-1904, Idaho Code, the amount paid or about to be paid by the department on behalf of the individual, and, if applicable, the fact that the amount of the lien may increase over time.

The department shall file any notice of lien under this section within ninety (90) days of the final determination of the department, after hearing if any, required in subsection (1)(b) of this section, with the exception of property against which the department is prevented from filing a lien pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. With respect to the property described in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall file a notice of lien within ninety (90) days after the department is notified in writing that subsection (2) of this section ceases to apply to the property.

Any lien imposed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall dissolve upon the individual’s discharge from the medical institution and return home.

No recovery shall be made under this section for medical assistance correctly paid except from such individual’s estate as defined in subsection (4) of section 56-218, Idaho Code, and subject to subsections (1)(d), (5) and (6) of section 56-218, Idaho Code, or upon sale of the property subject to a lien and may be made only after the death of such individual’s surviving spouse, if any, and only at a time:

When he has no surviving child who is under age twenty-one (21) years, or who is blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c; or

In the case of a lien on an individual’s home under subsection (1) of this section, when none of the following is lawfully residing in such home who has lawfully resided in such home on a continuous basis since the date of the individual’s admission to the medical institution:
(i) A sibling of the individual, who was residing in the individual’s home for a period of at least one (1) year immediately before the date of the individual’s admission to the medical institution; or

The director shall promulgate rules reasonably necessary to implement this section including, but not limited to, rules establishing undue hardship waivers, as provided in section 56-218(7), Idaho Code, and a procedure for notice and opportunity for hearing on the department’s determination that an individual cannot reasonably be expected to be discharged from a medical institution and to return home.

§ 56-219. Payment for incompetent recipient — Appointment of guardian for public assistance.

If the recipient is under legal disability, or is incompetent or unable to handle the assistance granted him under this act, and has no other legal guardian, the district court, after due notice and hearing, shall appoint, without fee, on petition of the state department, and with the consent of the recipient’s nearest kin, next friend, natural guardian or custodian, a capable and trustworthy person as his guardian for public assistance, without bond, whose duty it shall be, without compensation, to receive and disburse the recipient’s assistance on his behalf, and to make true and accurate account thereof as often as required by regulation to the state department, and as otherwise provided by law, to the district court. Funds in the hands of such guardian shall be disbursed only for the purposes contemplated by this act, or as directed in the grant thereof.

§ 56-220. Payment on death of recipient — Appointment of administrator of public assistance.

In the event of the death of a recipient, leaving little or no estate requiring formal administration, but to whom a check for public assistance has been delivered prior to his death, or for whose interment burial relief has been granted, the district court, without fee, on petition of the state department, and with the consent of the deceased recipient’s nearest kin, next friend, guardian, natural guardian or custodian, after due notice and hearing, shall appoint a capable and trustwarthy [trustworthy] person as his administrator for public assistance, without bond, whose duty it shall be, without compensation, to receive and disburse the recipient’s assistance on behalf of the deceased recipient’s estate, making true and accurate account thereof to the state department and the district court. Funds in the hands of such administrator shall be disbursed only for the purposes contemplated by this act, or as directed in the grant thereof.

§ 56-221. Confidential character of public assistance records.

The rule-making power of the state department shall include the power to establish and enforce reasonable rules and regulations governing the custody, use and preservation of the records, papers, files and communications of the state department. Wherever, under provisions of law, names and addresses of recipients of public assistance are furnished to or held by any state or county official, the names and addresses shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code; but any exemption from disclosure shall not prevent the furnishing to a state or local law enforcement officer, upon his written request, with the current address of any AFDC recipient if the officer furnishes the state department with such recipient’s name and social security account number and proof that such recipient is a convicted fugitive felon or an indicted fugitive felon, or a person for whom a fugitive warrant has been issued, and that the location or apprehension of such felon or person is within the officer’s official duties, and that the request is made in the proper exercise of those duties.

§ 56-222. Misuse of public assistance lists and records.

It shall be unlawful, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of public assistance and social services, and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department, for any person or persons to disclose, or make use of, or to authorize, knowingly permit, or participate in the use of, any list of names, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving such assistance or services, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files or communications of the state or county or subdivisions or agencies thereof, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

§ 56-223. Public assistance not assignable.

Public assistance awarded under this act shall not be transferable or assignable, and none of the money paid or payable under this act shall be subject to execution, attachment, or other legal process; except that the department may transfer funds to another public agency in lieu of payments to recipients, said funds to be transferred by such agency to project sponsors for payment as wages to said recipients participating in special work projects.

§ 56-224. Recovery.

The department may recover the amount of any public assistance obtained by any person who was not entitled thereto. If at any time during the continuance of assistance, the recipient thereof becomes possessed of any property or income in excess of the amount stated in the application, it shall be the duty of the recipient to notify the state department immediately of the receipt or possession of such property or income. Any assistance granted after the recipient has come into possession of such property or income in excess of eligibility standards, may be recovered by the state department.

On the death of a recipient who has received public assistance to which he was not entitled, or who has received public assistance in an amount greater than that to which he was entitled, by reason of possession or having come into possession of resources which he did not disclose to the department, or which had, or which acquired, a greater value than was disclosed, the total amount of such assistance paid to such recipient to which he was not entitled shall be allowed as a preferred claim against the estate of such recipient.

§ 56-224a, 56-224b. Recovery from recipients who own real property — Authorizing director to compromise or release claims and liens. [Repealed.]

§ 56-224c. Old age assistance recipients

Liens and indebtedness excused. [Repealed.]

§ 56-225. Request for notice of transfer or encumbrance of real property — Rulemaking.

When an individual receives medical assistance subject to recovery under this chapter and the individual is the holder of record title to real property or the purchaser under a land sale contract, the department of health and welfare may present to the county recorder for recording in the grants and conveyances records of a county a request for notice of transfer or encumbrance of the real property. The department shall adopt a rule providing prior notice and hearing rights to the record titleholder or purchaser under a land sale contract.

The department shall present to the county recorder for recording a termination of request for notice of transfer or encumbrance when, in the judgment of the department, it is no longer necessary or appropriate for the department to monitor transfers or encumbrances related to the real property.

The department shall adopt by rule a form for the request for notice of transfer or encumbrance and the termination of request for notice of transfer or encumbrance that, at a minimum:

Contains the name of the public assistance recipient, and the spouse of such public assistance recipient, if any, and a departmental case identifier or other appropriate information that links the individual who is the holder of record title to real property or the purchaser under a land sale contract to the individual’s public assistance records;

Contains the legal description of the real property;

Contains a mailing address for the department to receive the notice of transfer or encumbrance; and

Complies with the requirements for recording in section 55-805, Idaho Code, for those forms intended to be recorded.

The request for notice of transfer or encumbrance described in this section does not affect title to real property and is not a lien on, encumbrance of, or other interest in, the real property.

§ 56-226. Medicaid fraud control unit.

There is hereby established in the office of the attorney general the medicaid fraud control unit which shall have the authority and responsibilities as set forth in this section.

Notwithstanding the authority and responsibility granted to the director of the department to provide for fraud control in other aspects of public assistance and public health programs, the medicaid fraud control unit shall have the authority and responsibility to conduct a statewide program for the investigation and prosecution of violations of all applicable Idaho laws pertaining to fraud in the administration of the medicaid program, the provision of medical assistance and in the activities of providers of medical assistance and services under the state plan. Further, upon approval of the inspector general of the relevant federal agency, the office of the attorney general shall have the authority and responsibility to investigate and to prosecute violations of any aspect of the provision of health care services and activities of providers of such services under any federal health care program as defined in 42 U.S.C. section 1320(a)-7b(f)1, if the suspected fraud or violation of law in such investigation or prosecution is substantially related to the state plan. The medicaid fraud control unit shall be under the exclusive control of the attorney general and be separate and distinct from the department. No official from the department shall have authority to review or override the prosecutorial decisions made by the medicaid fraud control unit.

The medicaid fraud control unit shall also:

Review complaints of abuse or neglect of medicaid recipients in health care facilities which receive payment pursuant to the state plan and may review complaints of the misappropriation of patients’ private funds in such facilities; and

Review complaints of abuse or neglect of medicaid recipients residing in a board and care facility.

The medicaid fraud control unit shall attempt to collect or refer to the department for collection overpayments that are made to providers of facilities under the state plan or under any federal health care program to health care facilities that are the result of fraudulent acts and that are discovered by the medicaid fraud control unit in carrying out its responsibilities under this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of Idaho Code, all funds collected by the medicaid fraud control unit in accordance with this subsection (4) shall be deposited into the state general fund.

The office of the attorney general shall employ such auditors, attorneys, investigators and other personnel as are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the medicaid fraud control unit as set forth under this section.

The office of the attorney general shall submit to the secretary of the federal department of health and human services applications and reports containing such information as is determined by the secretary by regulation to be necessary to meet the requirements of subchapter XIX, chapter 7, title 42, U.S.C.

In carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this section, the medicaid fraud control unit may:

Request and receive the assistance of any prosecutor or law enforcement agency in the investigation and prosecution of any violation of any applicable Idaho laws pertaining to fraud in the administration of the medicaid program, the provision of medical assistance and in the activities of providers of medical assistance and services under the state plan;
(b) Enter upon the premises of any provider participating in the medicaid program to:

Examine all accounts and records that are relevant in determining the existence of fraud in the medicaid program;

Investigate alleged abuse or neglect of medicaid recipients; or

Investigate alleged misappropriation of patients’ private funds. The accounts or records of a nonmedicaid recipient may not be reviewed by, or turned over to the medicaid fraud control unit without the patient’s written consent or a court order; and

Existence of civil violations or criminal offenses under this chapter or related offenses;

Existence of medicaid recipient abuse, mistreatment or neglect; or

Theft of medicaid recipient funds.

The medicaid fraud control unit shall safeguard the privacy rights of medicaid recipients to avoid unnecessary disclosure of personal information concerning named medicaid recipients. The medicaid fraud control unit may transmit such information that it deems appropriate to the department and to other agencies concerned with the regulation of health care facilities or health professionals.

The attorney general shall have the authority to adopt rules necessary to implement the duties and responsibilities assigned to the medicaid fraud control unit under this section.

As used in this section:

“Board and care facility” means a provider of medicaid services in a residential setting which receives payment from or on behalf of two (2) or more unrelated adults who reside in such facility, and for whom one (1) or more of the following is provided:

Nursing care services provided by, or under the supervision of, a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nurses aide; or

A substantial amount of personal care services that assist residents with the activities of daily living, including personal hygiene, dressing, bathing, eating, toileting, ambulation, transfer of positions, self-medication, body care, travel to medical services, essential shopping, meal preparation, laundry and housework.

“Department” means the Idaho department of health and welfare.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of health and welfare.

“Medicaid” means Idaho’s medical assistance program.

“Provider” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation or organization, public or private, which provides residential or assisted living services, certified family home services, nursing facility services or services offered pursuant to medical assistance.

“Recipient” means an individual determined eligible by the director for the services provided in the state plan for medicaid.

“State plan” means the Idaho state plan pursuant to subchapter XIX, chapter 7, title 42 U.S.C.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon written request have full access to all records held by a medicaid provider, or by any other person on his or her behalf, that are relevant to the determination of the:

No person holding such records shall refuse to provide the medicaid fraud control unit access to such records for the purposes described in this section on the basis that release would violate the medicaid recipient’s right of privacy or privilege against disclosure or use or any professional or other privilege or right.

§ 56-227. Fraudulent acts — Penalty.

Whoever knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person in obtaining, by means of a willfully false statement or representation, material omission, or fraudulent devices, public assistance to which he is not entitled, or in an amount greater than that to which he is justly entitled, shall be punished in the same manner and to the same extent as for larceny or theft of the money or value of the public assistance so obtained or attempted to be so obtained.

Whoever sells, conveys, mortgages or otherwise disposes of his property, real or personal, or conceals his income or resources, for the purpose of rendering him eligible for public assistance, theretofore or thereafter applied for, to which he would not otherwise be entitled, shall be punished in the same manner and to the same extent as for larceny or theft of the money or value of the public assistance so obtained or so attempted to be obtained. Provided however, this provision shall not be construed to be more restrictive than federal or state provisions regarding the transfer of property for public assistance.

Every person who knowingly aids or abets any person in selling, conveying, mortgaging or otherwise disposing of his property, real or personal, or in concealing his income or resources for the purpose of rendering him eligible for public assistance, theretofore or thereafter applied for and received, to which he would not otherwise be entitled, shall be punished in the same manner and to the same extent as for larceny or theft of the money or value of the public assistance so obtained or attempted to be obtained. Provided however, this provision shall not apply to any person who communicates information or renders advice to another regarding federal or state provisions regarding the transfer of property for public assistance.

For the purpose of this section public assistance shall include the specific categories of assistance for which provision is made in any federal or state law existing or hereafter enacted by the congress of the United States or the state of Idaho by which payments are made from the federal government to the state in aid or in respect to payment by the state for welfare purposes to any category of needy person and any other program of assistance for which provision for federal or state funds for aid may from time to time be made.

The state department of health and welfare shall establish and operate a fraud control program to investigate suspected fraud relating to applications for public assistance benefits, and public assistance benefits received by individuals or entities. Such activities shall be those which do not fall under the authority of the medicaid fraud control unit as provided in section 56-226, Idaho Code. The department shall establish a procedure to coordinate information with prosecuting attorneys to prosecute offenders who commit fraudulent acts pursuant to this chapter.

§ 56-227A. Provider fraud — Criminal penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any provider or person, knowingly, with intent to defraud, by means of a wilfully false statement or representation or by deliberate concealment of any material fact, or any other fraudulent scheme or device, to:

present for allowance or payment any false or fraudulent claim for furnishing services or supplies; or

attempt to obtain or to obtain authorization for furnishing services or supplies; or

attempt to obtain or to obtain compensation from public funds greater than that to which he is legally entitled for services or supplies furnished or purportedly furnished.

Any provider or person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony. Nothing in this section shall prohibit or preclude a provider or person from being prosecuted under any other provision of the criminal code.

§ 56-227B. Provider fraud — Damages.

Any provider who knowingly with intent to defraud by means of false statement or representation, obtains compensation from public funds greater than that to which he is legally entitled for services or supplies furnished or purportedly furnished shall be liable for civil damages equal to three (3) times the amount by which any figure is falsely overstated. The director of the department of health and welfare or the attorney general shall have the right to cause legal action to be taken for the recovery of such damages when persuaded that a reimbursement claim for payment is falsely overstated. The burden of proof for such recovery action shall be that which is used in other civil actions for the recovery of damages. The remedy provided by this section shall be in addition to any other remedy provided by law.

If any provider of services or supplies is required to refund or repay all or part of any payment received by said provider under the provisions of this section, said refund or repayment shall bear interest from the date payment was made to such provider to the date of said refund or repayment. Interest shall accrue at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum. The prevailing party in an action, under this section shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in bringing or defending the action. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Idaho Code, all costs and attorney’s fees awarded to the department of health and welfare or the attorney general pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the state general fund.

§ 56-227C. Subpoena power.

The director, or his authorized representative, and the director of the Idaho state police or his authorized representative, for the purposes contemplated by this act, have power to issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, administer oaths, certify to official acts, take depositions within and without the state of Idaho, as now provided by law, compel the production of pertinent books, payrolls, accounts, papers, records, documents and testimony. If a person in attendance before such director or his authorized representative refuses, without reasonable cause, to be examined or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce a book or paper or other evidence when ordered so to do by the director or his authorized representative, said director or his authorized representative may apply to the judge of the district court of the county where such person is in attendance, upon affidavit for an order returnable in not less than two (2) or more than five (5) days, directing such person to show cause before such judge, or any other judge of such district, why he should not be punished for contempt; upon the hearing of such order, if the judge shall determine that such person has refused, without reasonable cause or legal excuse, to be examined or to answer a legal or pertinent question, or to produce a book or paper which he was ordered to bring or produce, he may forthwith punish the offender as for contempt of court.

If any person asks to be excused from attending or testifying or from producing any books, payrolls, accounts, papers, records, documents or other evidence in connection with any investigation or inquiry or upon any hearing before any officer so authorized pursuant to this subsection (1), or in any proceeding or action before any court upon a charge or violation of this subsection (1), on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to penalty or forfeiture, and if such person, notwithstanding such request, is directed to give such testimony or produce such evidence, the person must, if so directed by the director or his authorized representative, comply with such direction.

After complying, and if, but for this subsection (1), the person would have been privileged to withhold the answer given or the evidence produced by him, then the answer, the evidence and any information directly or indirectly derived from the answer or evidence, may not be used against the compelled person in any manner in a criminal case, except that the person may nevertheless be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing or contempt committed in answering or failing to answer or in producing or failing to produce evidence in accordance with the order. Such evidence may be used in the refusal, suspension or revocation of any license, permission or authority conferred, or to be conferred, pursuant to Idaho Code.

The attorney general or any prosecuting attorney or the designated agent of either shall have the authority to issue subpoenas to an enrolled or formerly enrolled provider of services pursuant to the medicaid program to compel production of any books, payrolls, accounts, papers, records or documents that are required to be maintained under the medicaid provider agreement executed by such provider or formerly enrolled provider as may be relevant to an investigation of fraud or other crime directly related to the use of medicaid program funds or services provided through the medicaid program that are not already in the possession of the director of the department of health and welfare or his designated agent. The attorney general or any prosecuting attorney or the designated agent of either may also compel testimony by the custodian of the items subpoenaed concerning the production and authenticity of those items. Subpoenas for records or information which are not required to be maintained under a provider agreement shall only be issued through subpoena powers in judicial proceedings. A subpoena under this subsection (2) shall describe the items required to be produced with particularity and prescribe a return date of a reasonable period of time within which the items can be assembled and made available to the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney or the designated agent of either.

Subpoenas issued pursuant to this section shall be served and witness fees and mileage paid as allowed in civil cases in the district courts of this state.

Investigators employed by the attorney general for the investigation and prosecution of providers of services pursuant to the medicaid program shall have all the authority given by statute to peace officers of the state of Idaho, including, but not limited to, authority to obtain, serve and execute warrants of arrest and warrants of search and seizure.

§ 56-227D. Federal food stamps, also known as supplemental nutrition assistance program — Unauthorized use — Exception — Definition.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to buy, receive, sell, give away, dispose of, exchange or barter any federal food stamp benefits of a value less than one hundred dollars ($100).

It is a felony for any person to buy, receive, sell, give away, dispose of, exchange or barter any federal food stamp benefits of a value of one hundred dollars ($100) or more.

This section does not apply to any person buying, receiving, selling, giving away, disposing of, exchanging or bartering any federal food stamp benefits subsequent to the redemption of such stamps in the manner provided by state or federal law.

As used in this section, federal food stamp benefits refers to food stamp benefits issued in any form by the United States department of agriculture or its duly authorized agent for the sole purpose of purchasing food.

This section shall be enforced by the director of the department of health and welfare in cooperation with local law enforcement and prosecuting agencies. Such enforcement shall not be the responsibility of the medicaid fraud control unit as provided in section 56-226, Idaho Code.

§ 56-227E. Obstruction of investigation.

An obstruction of investigation consists of knowingly:

Providing false information to, or knowingly withholding information from, any person requesting such information if that person is authorized to investigate a violation of this chapter or to enforce the criminal or civil remedies of this chapter where that information is properly requested and is material to the investigation or enforcement; or

Altering any document or record required to be retained pursuant to this chapter or any rule issued by the department of health and welfare, when the alteration is intended to mislead an investigation and concerns information material to that investigation.

Whoever commits an obstruction of investigation shall be guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of section 18-112, Idaho Code.

§ 56-227F. Public assistance benefit cards — Prohibited uses.

Any recipient of public assistance is prohibited from using public assistance benefit cards or cash obtained with public assistance benefit cards:

For the purpose of participating in any of the activities described under chapters 38 and 49, title 18, Idaho Code, or authorized pursuant to any state-tribal gaming compact under section 67-429A, Idaho Code;

For the purpose of pari-mutuel betting authorized under chapter 25, title 54, Idaho Code;

To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter 74, title 67, Idaho Code;

For the purpose of participating in or purchasing tattoo, branding or body piercing services as defined in section 18-1523, Idaho Code;

To purchase cigarettes as defined in section 39-7802(d), Idaho Code, or tobacco products or electronic smoking devices as defined in section 39-5702(13), Idaho Code;

To purchase any items regulated under title 23, Idaho Code;

For the purpose of adult entertainment at venues with performances that contain sexually oriented material where minors under the age of eighteen (18) years are prohibited; or

For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any activities in any location listed in subsection (2) of this section.

The following businesses are required to comply with the provisions of this section:

Any establishment or business licensed under chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code;

State liquor stores defined under section 23-902, Idaho Code, with the exception of special distributors as referenced in chapter 3, title 23, Idaho Code;

Any business or agency that issues or underwrites bail bonds as defined in section 41-1038(3), Idaho Code;

Gambling establishments licensed under Idaho law;

Any business or establishment that offers tattoo, body piercing or branding services as defined in section 18-1523, Idaho Code;

Adult entertainment venues with performances that contain sexually oriented material where minors under the age of eighteen (18) years are prohibited; and

Any establishment where persons under the age of eighteen (18) years are not permitted.

The department shall notify any business determined to be in violation of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and the licensing authority of any such business, if applicable, that such business has continued to allow the use of a public assistance benefit card in violation of subsection (2) of this section. The department may require the Idaho quest electronic benefits transfer (EBT) card business identification number (BIN) be disabled at any business found to be in violation of subsection (2) of this section. Any business in violation of subsection (2) of this section may also be required to deny all public assistance cash transactions made with an Idaho quest EBT card at any automated teller machine (ATM) located in their establishment. All costs associated with disabling the BIN and ATM will be the responsibility of such business owner.

Only the recipient, an eligible member of the recipient’s household or the recipient’s authorized representative may use a public assistance benefit card or the benefit, and such use shall only be for the respective benefit program purposes. The recipient shall not sell, attempt to sell, exchange or donate a public assistance benefit card or any benefits to any other person or entity.
(5) A violation of subsection (1) or (4) of this section by a recipient constitutes a misdemeanor.

The department shall notify all recipients of public assistance benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) or (4) of this section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.

Whenever the department has confirmed that a person has violated subsection (1) or (4) of this section, the department shall notify the person in writing that the violation could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.

(6) As used in this section, “public assistance” or “public assistance benefit” means benefits provided to a recipient pursuant to the temporary assistance for families in Idaho (TAFI) program on an Idaho quest EBT card account.

(7) This section shall be enforced by the director of the department of health and welfare in cooperation with local law enforcement and prosecuting agencies.

§ 56-228. Limitations of act.

All assistance awarded under this act shall be deemed to be awarded and to be held subject to the provisions of any amending or repealing act that may hereafter be passed, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of his assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing act.

§ 56-229. Separability.

If any portion of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the main portions thereof.

§ 56-230. Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Public Assistance Law.”

§ 56-231. Public assistance in locating and determining the financial resources of parents and other persons liable for support of dependents.

To assist in locating and determining the financial resources of parents who have deserted their children and other persons liable for support of dependents, the department of health and welfare and county prosecuting attorneys may request and shall receive information from the records of all departments, boards, bureaus or other agencies of this state, and may request and may receive information from businesses and financial entities; and the same are authorized to provide such information as is necessary for this purpose, notwithstanding any provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, making the information exempt from disclosure. There shall be no legal sanctions imposed against a business or financial entity which refuses to provide requested information, unless the business or financial entity has been served with a subpoena requesting the information. Only information directly bearing on the identity, financial resources, and whereabouts of a person owing or asserted to be owing an obligation of support shall be requested and used or transmitted by the department of health and welfare and county prosecuting attorneys pursuant to the authority conferred by this act. The department of health and welfare and county prosecuting attorneys may make such information available only to public officials and agencies of this state, other states and the political subdivisions of this state and other states seeking to locate parents who have deserted their children and other persons liable for support of dependents for the purpose of enforcing their liability for support.

§ 56-232. Medical assistance programs — Contracts with independent agencies for administration of programs.

The agency, board, or governmental unit of the state of Idaho designated as the responsible agency for the administration of medical assistance programs which involve the participation of the federal government under the provisions of title XIX of the Social Security Act of 1965, as amended, is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements with life insurance companies qualified in this state, hospital or medical service corporations qualified in this state, or other appropriate independent organizations or corporations for the administration of such medical assistance programs, subject however, to the rules and regulations of the designated responsible governmental agency. Any such contract shall, among other provisions, set forth the term, consideration to be paid for such service, the general duties and procedures of the contract, accounting procedures, and such other matters as may be required to insure the proper administration of the benefits provided by the statutes of Idaho and the rules and regulations authorized therein with reference to the programs established by title XIX of the Social Security Act of 1965, as amended. Such contract shall be signed by the governor of the state of Idaho on behalf of the state.